apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>els</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eling</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eling</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eling</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ight</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ight</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ights</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ighting</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ighting</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ighting</l>        <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eing</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ght</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ght</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ghts</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ghting</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ghting</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ghting</l>        <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ew</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>own</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>id</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>id</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ids</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ade</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ad</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>idden</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>idding</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>idding</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>idding</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/go__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>go</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>go</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>goes</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>went</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>gone</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>going</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>going</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>going</l>        <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ee</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ee</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ees</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aw</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>een</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeing</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeing</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eeing</l>        <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="s/ell__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ell</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ell</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ells</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>old</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>old</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elling</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elling</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elling</l>        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="forg/et__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ets</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ot</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>otten</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>etting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>etting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>etting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="forgo"><i>for</i><par n="/go__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="go into debt"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>debt</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>debt</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="feel better"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>better</l><r><g><b/>better</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go over"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r><g><b/>over</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go out"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go skiing"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>skiing</l><r><g><b/>skiing</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go to"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go and get drunk"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>and<b/>get<b/>drunk</l><r><g><b/>and<b/>get<b/>drunk</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go berserk"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>berserk</l><r><g><b/>berserk</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go on strike"><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on<b/>strike</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>strike</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go down"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go in"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go on"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go on"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><j/>on<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go back"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go through"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>through</l><r><g><b/>through</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go up"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fight"><i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="feel"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="feel like"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>like</l><r><g><b/>like</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fly"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flee"><i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forbid"><i>forb</i><par n="forb/id__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foresee"><i>fores</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forget"><i>forg</i><par n="forg/et__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="go"><par n="/go__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="light"><i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forsee"><i>fors</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sell"><i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sell out"><i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="tell"><i>t</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="retell"><i>ret</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undergo"><i>under</i><par n="/go__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undergo changes"><i>under</i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>changes</l><r><g><b/>changes</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="go Dutch"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>Dutch</l><r><g><b/>Dutch</g></r></p></e>
